Tennessee, session 114, SB0150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-902, is amended by adding the
following as a new, appropriately designated subdivision:
( ) "CLT" means the Classic Learning Test administered by Classic Learning
Initiatives, LLC;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-902(1), is amended by deleting
the language "ACT or SAT score" and substituting instead "ACT, SAT, or CLT score,".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-907(3), is amended by deleting
subdivision (B) and substituting instead the following:
(B) Attain a composite ACT score of at least twenty-one (21) on any single ACT
test date or a concordant equivalent score on the SAT on any single SAT test date or on
the CLT on any single CLT test date.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-908(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the language:
a composite ACT score of at least 21 on any single ACT test date or a concordant
equivalent score on the SAT on any single SAT test date
wherever it appears in the subdivision and substituting instead:
a composite ACT score of at least twenty-one (21) on any single ACT test date or a
concordant equivalent score on the SAT on any single SAT test date or on the CLT on
any single CLT test date
SB0150
000909
- 1 -

SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-916, is amended by deleting the
language:
Attain a composite ACT score of at least 29 on any single ACT test date or a concordant
equivalent score on the SAT on any single SAT test date
wherever it appears in the section and substituting instead:
Attain a composite ACT score of at least twenty-nine (29) on any single ACT test date or
a concordant equivalent score on the SAT on any single SAT test date or on the CLT on
any single CLT test date
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-920(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (6) and substituting instead the following:
(6) Attain a composite ACT score of at least eighteen (18) on any single ACT
test date or a concordant equivalent score on the SAT on any single SAT test date or on
the CLT on any single CLT test date; and
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-932, is amended by deleting the
language "ACT and SAT" wherever it appears in the section and substituting instead "ACT,
SAT, and CLT".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-935(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (3) and substituting instead the following:
(3) Attains a composite ACT score of at least twenty-one (21) on any single ACT
test date or a concordant equivalent score on the SAT on any single SAT test date or on
the CLT on any single CLT test date;
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-101, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
- 2 - 000909

(d) Public institutions of higher education are authorized to accept a student's
score on the ACT, CLT, or SAT, as those terms are defined in § 49-4-902, for purposes
of admission to the institution.
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-6010(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "or an equivalent score on the SAT" and substituting instead "or an
equivalent score on the SAT or Classic Learning Test (CLT)".
SECTION 11. The Tennessee student assistance corporation may promulgate rules to
effectuate Sections 1-8 of this act, including rules to establish scores on the Classic Learning
Test that are the concordant equivalent to scores achieved by students on the ACT or SAT.
The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act,
compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.
SECTION 12. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 000909